FR940622-2-00075 FR940622-2-00058 UNITED STATES NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION Biweekly Notice Applications and Amendments to Facility Operating Licenses Involving No Significant Hazards Considerations I. Background Pursuant to Public Law 97-415, the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission (the Commission or NRC staff) is publishing this regular biweekly notice. Public Law 97-415 revised section 189 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act), to require the Commission to publish notice of any amendments issued, or proposed to be issued, under a new provision of section 189 of the Act. This provision grants the Commission the authority to issue and make immediately effective any amendment to an operating license upon a determination by the Commission that such amendment involves no significant hazards consideration, notwithstanding the pendency before the Commission of a request for a hearing from any person. This biweekly notice includes all notices of amendments issued, or proposed to be issued from May 27, 1994, through June 10, 1994. The last biweekly notice was published on June 8, 1994 (59 FR 29623). Notice Of Consideration Of Issuance Of Amendments To Facility Operating Licenses, Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determination, And Opportunity For A Hearing The Commission has made a proposed determination that the following amendment requests involve no significant hazards consideration. Under the Commission's regulations in 10 CFR 50.92, this means that operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The basis for this proposed determination for each amendment request is shown below. The Commission is seeking public comments on this proposed determination. Any comments received within 30 days after the date of publication of this notice will be considered in making any final determination. Normally, the Commission will not issue the amendment until the expiration of the 30-day notice period. However, should circumstances change during the notice period such that failure to act in a timely way would result, for example, in derating or shutdown of the facility, the Commission may issue the license amendment before the expiration of the 30-day notice period, provided that its final determination is that the amendment involves no significant hazards consideration. The final determination will consider all public and State comments received before action is taken. Should the Commission take this action, it will publish in the Federal Register a notice of issuance and provide for opportunity for a hearing after issuance. The Commission expects that the need to take this action will occur very infrequently. Written comments may be submitted by mail to the Rules Review and Directives Branch, Division of Freedom of Information and Publications Services, Office of Administration, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, and should cite the publication date and page number of this Federal Register notice. Written comments may also be delivered to Room 6D22, Two White Flint North, 11555 Rockville Pike, Rockville, Maryland from 7:30 a.m. to 4:15 p.m. Federal workdays. Copies of written comments received may be examined at the NRC Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555. The filing of requests for a hearing and petitions for leave to intervene is discussed below. By July 22, 1994, the licensee may file a request for a hearing with respect to issuance of the amendment to the subject facility operating license and any person whose interest may be affected by this proceeding and who wishes to participate as a party in the proceeding must file a written request for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene. Requests for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's ``Rules of Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. Interested persons should consult a current copy of 10 CFR 2.714 which is available at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555 and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved. If a request for a hearing or petition for leave to intervene is filed by the above date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, designated by the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition; and the Secretary or the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issue a notice of a hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall set forth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceeding, and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding. The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention should be permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) the nature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to the proceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial, or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of any order which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest. The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subject matter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Any person who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has been admitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave of the Board up to 15 days prior to the first prehearing conference scheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfy the specificity requirements described above. Not later than 15 days prior to the first prehearing conference scheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to the petition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions which are sought to be litigated in the matter. Each contention must consist of a specific statement of the issue of law or fact to be raised or controverted. In addition, the petitioner shall provide a brief explanation of the bases of the contention and a concise statement of the alleged facts or expert opinion which support the contention and on which the petitioner intends to rely in proving the contention at the hearing. The petitioner must also provide references to those specific sources and documents of which the petitioner is aware and on which the petitioner intends to rely to establish those facts or expert opinion. Petitioner must provide sufficient information to show that a genuine dispute exists with the applicant on a material issue of law or fact. Contentions shall be limited to matters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. The contention must be one which, if proven, would entitle the petitioner to relief. A petitioner who fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirements with respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participate as a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subject to any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have the opportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, including the opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. If a hearing is requested, the Commission will make a final determination on the issue of no significant hazards consideration. The final determination will serve to decide when the hearing is held. If the final determination is that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration, the Commission may issue the amendment and make it immediately effective, notwithstanding the request for a hearing. Any hearing held would take place after issuance of the amendment. If the final determination is that the amendment request involves a significant hazards consideration, any hearing held would take place before the issuance of any amendment. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filed with the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Services Branch, or may be delivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington DC 20555, by the above date. Where petitions are filed during the last 10 days of the notice period, it is requested that the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephone call to Western Union at 1-(800) 248-5100 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700). The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number N1023 and the following message addressed to (Project Director) : petitioner's name and telephone number, date petition was mailed, plant name, and publication date and page number of this Federal Register notice. A copy of the petition should also be sent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions, supplemental petitions and/or requests for a hearing will not be entertained absent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board that the petition and/or request should be granted based upon a balancing of factors specified in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). For further details with respect to this action, see the application for amendment which is available for public inspection at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555, and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved. Consolidated Edison Company of New York, Docket No. 50-247, Indian Point Nuclear Generating Unit No. 2, Westchester County, New York Date of amendment request: April 26, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would revise the Technical Specifications to change the Table 3.5-1 High Containment Pressure ( Hi Level), Safety Injection Setting Limit from less than or equal to 2.0 psig to less than or equal to 5.0 psig. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: The proposed change does not involve a significant hazards consideration since: 1. There is no significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident. It is proposed that the High Containment Pressure (Hi Level) actuation setting of [less than or equal to] 2.0 psig be revised to [less than or equal to] 5.0 psig. This additional operating flexibility will decrease the frequency of Containment venting necessary to relieve containment of non-condensible gases which build up during normal operation. Based upon a statistical analysis of the containment pressure channel uncertainty for a 30 month operating cycle, a margin must be allowed between the Technical Specification limit (plant setting) and the Safety Analysis limit so that the Safety Analysis limit(s) will not be exceeded under the worst circumstances. For a Technical Specification value of [less than or equal to] 5.0 psig, the corresponding Safety Analysis limit must be increased to 10 psig to provide margin for the channel statistical allowance. A safety evaluation performed pursuant to 10 CFR 50.59 is on file which supports a change in the Safety Analysis limit from 7.3 psig (current value) to 10.0 psig. Key conclusions of the Safety Evaluation are that neither the probability nor the consequences of an accident or malfunction of equipment important to safety previously evaluated in the Safety Analysis report would be increased. Thus, assurance is provided that appropriate protective actions in accordance with the Technical Specifications will be taken so that Safety Analysis limits are not exceeded. 2. The possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed has not been created. The proposed change in the Technical Specification limit together with the change in the Safety Analysis limit provides adequate margin to accommodate instrument channel uncertainty over a 30 month operating cycle. Plant equipment, which would be set at the Technical Specification limit, will therefore provide protective functions to assure that safety analysis limits are not exceeded. This would prevent the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from that previously evaluated from occurring. 3. There has been no reduction in the margin of safety. The proposed change to the Technical Specification limit would decrease the frequency of containment purges necessary to vent the build up of non-condensible gases during normal operation. This would result in a decrease in the amount of radioactivity discharged to the environment (due to decay), decrease the potential for high Containment pressure alarms and increase the margin for an ESF trip. The change to the Safety Analysis limits, justified by a safety Evaluation performed in accordance with 10 CFR 50.59, assures sufficient margin exists to accommodate channel instrument uncertainty over the maximum operating cycle length. This margin is necessary so that safety functions will occur and Safety Analysis limits will be preserved. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: White Plains Public Library, 100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York 10610. Attorney for licensee: Brent L. Brandenburg, Esq., 4 Irving Place, New York, New York 10003. NRC Project Director: Michael L. Boyle Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina Date of amendment request: May 24, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendments would transfer the boron concentration in Technical Specification (TS) 3.9.1 for the reactor coolant system and the refueling canal during MODE 6, and the boron concentration in TS 3.9.12 for the spent fuel pool from the TS to the Core Operating Limits Report (COLR). The application is submitted in response to the guidance in Generic Letter 88-16 which addresses the transfer of fuel cycle-specific parameter limits from the TS to the COLR. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: The following analysis, performed pursuant to 10 CFR 50.91, shows that the proposed amendment will not create a significant hazards consideration as defined by the criteria of 10 CFR 50.92. 1. This amendment will not significantly increase the probability or consequence of any accident previously evaluated. No component modification, system realignment, or change in operating procedure will occur which could affect the probability of any accident or transient. The relocation of boron concentration values to the COLR is an adminsitrative change which will have no effect on the probability or consequences of any previously-analyzed accident. The required values of boron concentration will continue to be determined through use of approved methodologies. 2. This amendment will not create the possibility of any new or different accidents not previously evaluated. No component modification or system realignment will occur which could create the possibility of a new event not previously considered. The administrative change of relocating parameters to the COLR, in this case boron concentration, cannot create the probability of an accident. 3.This amendment will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Required boron concentrations will remain appropriate for each cycle, and will continue to be calculated using approved methodologies. There is no significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Atkins Library, University of North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223 Attorney for licensee: Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422 South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 NRC Project Director: David B. Matthews, Director GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-219, Oyster Creek Nuclear Generating Station, Ocean County, New Jersey Date of amendment request: May 12, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would revise Technical Specification Sections 3.1 and 4.1 for Protective Instrumentation, the associated bases, and tables to increase the surveillance test intervals (STIs) and add allowable out-of-service times (AOTs). All proposed STI and AOT changes are in accordance with General Electric Company Licensing Topical Reports (LTRs) which have been previously reviewed and approved by the NRC staff. Also, AOTs are clarified in accordance with the most recently approved BWR Owners' Group letters which were used in the development of NUREG-1433 ``Standard Technical Specifications, General Electric Plants, BWR/4.'' The Technical Specification changes will permit specified Channel Tests to be conducted quarterly rather than weekly or monthly. The amendment will enhance operational safety by reducing 1) the potential for inadvertent plant scrams, 2) excessive test cycles on equipment, and 3) the diversion of plant personnel and resources on unnecessary testing. Two additional technical changes are proposed. The first change involves extending the Channel Calibration interval for average power range monitor (APRM) scram instrumentation from weekly to quarterly. GPUN has evaluated the effect of drift on the setpoint over the longer interval for this instrumentation and found it to be acceptable. The second change would add a quarterly Channel Calibration requirement for High Drywell Pressure (for Core Cooling) and Turbine Trip Scram instrumentation. This would be a new requirement not currently incorporated in the Technical Specifications. Nineteen editorial changes have been incorporated in Instrumentation Sections 3.1 and 4.1 to provide clarity and consistency. These items are editorial only and do not alter the meaning or intent of any requirements. Examples of editorial changes are: 1) capitalize definitions where used, 2) punctuation and grammatical corrections, 3) ensuring consistency in STI nomenclature, and 4) reformat of tables. A table note and its associated footnote were deleted which involved a 1985 licensing condition which is no longer applicable. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analyses of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION EVALUATION OF TECHNICAL CHANGES 1. The operation of the Oyster Creek Nuclear Generating Station, in accordance with the proposed amendment, will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The generic analysis contained in LTR NEDC-30851P-A assessed the impact of changing RPS [reactor protection system] STIs and adding AOTs on RPS failure frequency, scram frequency and equipment cycling. Specifically, Section 5.7.4, ``Significant Hazards Assessment,'' of NEDC-30851P-A states that: Fewer challenges to the safeguards system, due to less frequent testing of the RPS, conservatively results in a decrease of approximately one percent in core damage frequency. This decrease is based upon the following: Based on the plant-specific experience presented in Appendix J, the estimated reduction in scram frequency (0.3 scrams/yr) represents a 1 to 2 percent decrease in core damage frequency based on the BWR plant-specific Probabilistic Risk Assessments (PRAs) listed in Table 5-8. The increase in core damage frequency due to less frequent testing is less than one percent. This increase is even lower (less than 0.01 percent) when the changes resulting from the implementation of the Anticipated Transients Without Scram (ATWS) rule are considered. Therefore, this increase is more than offset by the decrease in CDF [core damage frequency] due to fewer scrams. The effect of reducing unnecessary cycles on RPS equipment, although not easily quantifiable also results in a decrease in core damage frequency. The overall impact on core damage frequency of the changes in allowable out-of-service times is negligible. The BWR Owners' Group concluded that the proposed changes do not significantly increase the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated since the increase in probability of a scram failure due to RPS unavailability is insignificant. The overall probability of an accident is decreased as the time RPS logic operates as designed is increased resulting in less inadvertent scrams during testing and repair. The plant-specific evaluation performed by GPUN and GE demonstrates that while the Oyster Creek RPS differs from the generic model analyzed in the RPS LTR (NEDC-30851P-A), the net effect of the differences do not alter the generic conclusions. The AOTs proposed for RPS instrumentation are based on improved wording developed for use in NUREG 1433, ``Standard Technical Specifications, General Electric Plants, BWR/4,'' which ensures a loss of function does not occur. In addition, the change to the APRM Scram Channel Calibration surveillance interval from weekly to quarterly has been evaluated by GPUN to determine the effect on setpoint drift. The results of the evaluation show acceptable performance of this scram parameter ensuring that the safety analysis remains valid. The clarification that a Channel Calibration is not applicable to Turbine Trip Scram instrumentation is appropriate since this trip parameter senses turbine stop valve position via limit switches which are fixed in position and adjusted, as necessary, during valve maintenance. This trip parameter and its switch adjustment methods are similar to the Main Steamline Isolation Valve [MSIV] Scram for which the Technical Specifications require only a Channel Test. LTR NEDC-30936P-A (Parts 1 and 2) contains an assessment of the impact of changing STIs and AOTs for BWR ECCS Actuation Instrumentation. Section 4.0, ``Technical Assessment of Changes,'' of NEDC-30963P-A (Part 2) states that: The results indicate an insignificant (less than 5E-7 per year) increase in water injection function failure frequency when STIs are increased from 31 days to 92 days, AOTs for repair of the ECCS actuation instrumentation are increased from one hour to 24 hours, and AOTs for surveillance testing are increased from two to six hours. For all four BWR models the increase represents less than 4% increase in failure frequency. However, when other factors which influence the overall plant safety are considered, the net result is judged to be an improvement in plant safety. From this generic analysis, the BWR Owners' Group concluded that the proposed changes do not significantly increase the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated since the increase in probability of a water injection failure due to ECCS instrumentation unavailability is insignificant and the net result is judged to be an improvement in plant safety. The plant-specific evaluation performed by GPUN and GE demonstrates that while the Oyster Creek ECCS differs from the generic model analyzed in LTR NEDC-30936P-A, the net effect of the plant-specific differences do not alter the generic conclusions. The addition of a quarterly Channel Calibration STI for the High Drywell Pressure ECCS initiation parameter is consistent with the calibration interval requirement for other similar instrumentation at Oyster Creek and ensures the regular performance of calibrations. This is a new requirement not currently contained in the Technical Specifications and experience performing the High Drywell Pressure (Core Cooling) instrument calibration at a quarterly interval has proven adequate for instrument performance monitoring. LTRs NEDC-30851P-A, Supplement 2 and NEDC-31677P-A contain generic analyses assessing the impact of changing STIs and AOTs for BWR Isolation Actuation Instrumentation which are common or not common to RPS and ECCS instrumentation. Section 4.0, ``Summary of Results,'' of NEDC-30851P-A, Supplement 2 states that: The results indicated that the effects on probability of failure to initiate isolation are very small and the effects on probability or frequency of failure to isolate are negligible in nearly every case. In addition, the results indicated that increasing the AOT to 24 hours for tests and repairs has a negligible effect on the probability of failure of the isolation function. These combined with changes to the testing intervals and allowed out-of-service times for RPS and ECCS instrumentation provide a net improvement to plant safety and operations. and Section 5.6, ``Assessment of Net Effect of Changes,'' of NEDC-31677P-A states that: A reduction in core damage frequency (CDF) of at least as much as estimated in the ECCS instrumentation analysis can be expected when the isolation actuation instrumentation STIs are changed from one month to three months. The chief contributor to this reduction is the channel functional tests for the MSIVs. Inadvertent closure of the MSIVs will cause an unnecessary plant scram. This reduction in CDF more than compensates for any small incremental increase (10% or 1.0E-07/year) in calculated isolation function failure frequency when the STI is extended to three months. Based on this generic analysis, the BWR Owners' Group concluded that the proposed changes do not significantly increase the consequences of an accident previously evaluated since the increase in probability of an isolation failure due to isolation instrumentation unavailability is insignificant. The proposed wording of the AOTs is based on the clarifications used in the development of NUREG 1433, ``Standard Technical Specifications, General Electric Plants, BWR/4,'' which ensures a loss of function does not occur where applied to isolation actuation instrumentation. LTR NEDC-30851P-A, Supplement 1 contains a generic analysis assessing the impact of changing control rod block STIs on Rod Block failure frequency. Section 5 (Brookhaven National Laboratory Technical Evaluation Report - Attachment 2 to the NRC SER) of NEDC-30851P-A, Supplement 1 states that: The BWROG proposed changes to the Technical Specifications concerning the test requirements for BWR control rod block instrumentation. The changes consist of increasing the surveillance test intervals form one to three months. These test interval extensions are consistent with the already approved changes to STIs for the reactor protection system. The technical analysis reviewed and verified as documented herein indicates that there will be no significant changes in the availability of the control rod block function if these changes are implemented. In addition, there will be a negligible impact on the plant core melt frequency due to the decreased testing. Bases contained in GE Topical Report GENE-770-1-A assessed the impact of changing STIs and AOTs on failure frequency for selected systems. Section 2.0, ``Summary,'' of GENE-770-06-1-A states that: Technical bases are provided for selected proposed changes to the instrumentation STIs and AOTs that were identified in the BWROG Improved BWR Technical Specification activity. These STI and AOT changes are consistent with approved changes to the RPS, ECCS, and isolation actuation instrumentation. These proposed changes do not result in a degradation to overall plant safety. The BWR Owners' Group concluded from the generic analysis in NEDC-30851P-A, Supplement 1 and the bases in GENE-770-06-1-A that the proposed changes do not significantly increase the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. GPUN's utilization of GENE-770-06-1-A is limited to the identified AOTs for Control Rod Block instrumentation analyzed in NEDC-30851P-A since the Control Rod Block LTR did not explicitly address AOTs. 2. The operation of Oyster Creek Nuclear Generating Station, in accordance with the proposed amendment, will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. The addition of allowable out-of-service times (AOTs) consistent with wording developed for use in Improved Standard Technical Specifications to ensure no loss of function and the revision of surveillance test intervals (STIs) does not alter the function of RPS, ECCS, Isolation or Rod Block instrumentation nor involve any type of plant modification. No new modes of plant operation are involved with the changes. Adding a quarterly Channel Calibration STI for High Drywell Pressure instrumentation (for Core Cooling) establishes a requirement in the Technical Specifications which is not currently incorporated. This is an additional requirement beyond that already in place for this instrumentation and will not alter its operation since by their nature STIs ensure proper instrument performance. The clarification that a Channel Calibration is not applicable to Turbine Trip Scram instrumentation is appropriate since this trip parameter senses turbine stop valve position via limit switches which are fixed in position and adjusted during valve maintenance. This trip parameter and its switch adjustment methods are similar to the Main Steamline Isolation Valve Scram for which the Technical Specifications require only a Channel Test. Revising the Channel Calibration STI for APRM Scram instruments from weekly to quarterly allows these instruments to benefit from the Channel Test STI change provided by the generic analysis in the RPS LTR. The benefits include a significant reduction in the number of half-scram states the plant will undergo reducing the potential for inadvertent plant trips. The effect of setpoint drift over the longer interval has been evaluated and found acceptable. The proposed changes will not alter the physical characteristics of any plant systems or components and all safety-related systems and components remain within their applicable design limits. Thus, system and component performance is not adversely affected by these changes, thereby assuring that the design capabilities of those systems and components are not challenged in a manner not previously assessed so as to create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident. 3. The operation of the Oyster Creek Nuclear Generating Station, in accordance with the proposed amendment, will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed and approved the generic studies contained in the GE Licensing Topical Reports and has concurred with the BWR Owners' Group that the proposed changes do not significantly affect the availability of RPS, ECCS Actuation, Isolation Actuation and Control Rod Block instrumentation. The proposed addition of allowable out-of-service times for instruments addressed by the LTRs provides reasonable times for making repairs and performing tests. The lack of sufficient out-of-service time provided in current Technical Specifications, increases the potential for an inadvertent scram or equipment actuation. The proposed AOTs provide realistic times to complete required actions without increasing overall instrument failure frequency and ensure that no loss of function occurs, therefore, there is no significant reduction in the margin of safety. The LTRs demonstrate that extending surveillance test intervals does not result in significant changes in the probability of instrument failure. Where Channel Calibration frequency has not changed, assurance exists that setpoints will not be affected by drift. In the case of the APRM Scram Channel Calibration, the proposed change to quarterly from weekly has been evaluated and found acceptable. Expected instrument performance over the extended interval will assure that applicable safety analyses will continue to be met. In addition, other instrumentation was evaluated for drift effects of setpoints and was found acceptable. The addition of a quarterly Channel Calibration interval for High Drywell Pressure (for Core Cooling) is consistent with Channel Calibration STIs for most other instrumentation at Oyster Creek and has been the interval used to achieve an adequate level of instrument performance monitoring. The clarification that a Channel Calibration is not applicable to Turbine Trip Scram instrumentation ensures consistency in the establishment of surveillance requirements. This trip parameter senses turbine stop valve position via limit switches which are fixed in position and adjusted during valve maintenance. This trip parameter and its switch adjustment methods are similar to the Main Steamline Isolation Valve Scram for which the Technical Specifications require only a Channel Test. These proposed changes, when coupled with the reduced probability of test-induced plant transients and equipment failures, do not result in a reduction in the margin of safety. No Significant Hazards Consideration Evaluation For Editorial Changes The above nineteen proposed changes are editorial in nature and are typical example I.c.2.e.i in 51FR7744. Therefore, they do not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The editorial changes described above do not change the design or operation of any structure, system or component relied upon to prevent or mitigate the consequences of any accident evaluated. These editorial changes also do not add new structures, systems or components which may have an effect on existing elements of the facility. The changes proposed correct, clarify and/or retain existing requirements. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident form any accident previously evaluated. Since neither physical changes to the facility nor changes in its operation are involved in the proposed editorial changes to the Technical Specifications, there is no possibility for creation of a new or different kind of accident. 3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. Facility configuration and operation are unaffected by the proposed editorial changes. As a result no changes in margin of safety occur. The editorial changes described and evaluated above are purely administrative to achieve consistency or correct an error in the Technical Specifications. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analyses and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied for both the technical issues and editorial changes. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Ocean County Library, Reference Department, 101 Washington Street, Toms River, New Jersey 08753 Attorney for licensee: Ernest L. Blake, Jr., Esquire. Shaw, Pittman, Potts & Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-289, Three Mile Island Nuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania Date of amendment request: February 10, 1994 Description of amendment request: The revision proposed by Technical Specification Change Request (TSCR) No. 230 to the Technical Specifications would revise specification 3.7.2.c, ``Unit Electric Power System,'' to eliminate testing of an emergency diesel generator (EDG) when the redundant EDG is inoperable. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. The proposed amendment serves to assure that an EDG is always available to perform on demand and the lower number of demands for performance reduce the probability of equipment failure. The required action no longer requires a ``test'' be performed. Therefore, the word ``test'' has been deleted from TS 3.7.2.c. The change is administrative. Since the proposed amendment does not affect the design or performance of the diesel generators or their ability to perform their design function, the change will not result in an increase in the consequences or probability of an accident previously analyzed. The proposed change will increase diesel generator reliability, thereby increasing overall plant safety. 2. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. Accidents involving loss of off-site power and single failure have been previously evaluated. The change does not introduce any new mode of plant operation or new accident precursors, involve any physical alterations to plant configurations, or make any changes to system setpoints which could initiate a new or different kind of accident. 3. Operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. This change does not result in a reduction in the margin of safety since there is no margin of safety associated with the supplemental immediate and daily testing of the operable EDG. If a margin of safety were presumed to exist, no reduction would result because of the proposed amendment: no physical modification to the plant or change to procedurally prescribed operator actions resulted from the proposed amendment. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Government Publications Section, State Library of Pennsylvania, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box 1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105. Attorney for licensee: Ernest L. Blake, Jr., Esquire, Shaw, Pittman, Potts & Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC 20037. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Maine Yankee Atomic Power Company, Docket No. 50-309, Maine Yankee Atomic Power Station, Lincoln County, Maine Date of amendment request: May 25, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would 1) allow entry through an operable personnel air lock hatch to perform surveillance testing, repair an inoperable hatch, or perform other necessary activities inside containment, 2) update plant Technical Specifications to reflect a previous change to the list of containment boundary valves, 3) add a new exception to allow quarterly surveillance testing of the excess flow check valves, 4) add a new exception to allow periodic preventive maintenance on control room ventilation lasting up to 30 minutes per calendar quarter without a written report of such inoperability, and 5) make related administrative changes to reflect and clarify items 1 through 4 above. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis against the standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c). The staff's analysis is presented below: 1. The proposed amendment would not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Containment air lock hatch entry, surveillance testing of the excess flow check valves, and preventive maintenance of control room ventilation are of short duration and do not alter any associated remedial action completion times, or the requirements of Technical Specification 3.0.A. If necessary, prompt operator action to restore containment integrity, excess flow check valve position, or control room ventilation is assured by plant operators, or individual(s) procedurally dedicated to perform such restoration. The subject containment boundary valves are manual containment isolation valves, and the current specification allows them to be repositioned under administrative control without compensatory measures to isolate the penetration. The boundary valves to be added remain closed during power operation, and are opened only after the reactor is shut down and cooldown has begun. The boundary valves to be deleted are open only during plant heatup. The staff therefore concludes that implementation of the proposed change will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. The proposed amendment would not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. The proposed change to containment air lock hatch entry, surveillance testing of the excess flow check valves, and preventive maintenance of the control room ventilation system, will not affect equipment reliability when such equipment is required to be operable. The Limiting Conditions for Operation and Remedial Actions for these items remain unchanged to govern operability of the equipment. The containment boundary valves being added are closed when the reactor is at power, and are opened only after the reactor is shut down. The boundary valves being deleted are open only during plant heatup. The subject boundary valves are manual containment isolation valves, and the current specification allows them to be repositioned under administrative control without compensatory measures to isolate the penetration. The staff therefore concludes that implementation of the proposed change will not create any new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. 3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed change would allow excess flow check valves to be exercised through approximately 1.5 inches of valve travel on a quarterly basis without declaring the valves inoperable or taking compensatory measures. Such testing constitutes approximately 15 minutes per calendar quarter, during which time containment isolation can easily be reestablished. Similarly, access through an operable air lock hatch would allow the hatch to be open for only a short period of time and while under control of an individual dedicated to operating the hatch. The proposed change also permits the control room ventilation system to be inoperable for 30 minutes per calendar quarter, without a written report of such inoperability. Because of the short time during which these systems are unavailable, and because operation is easily reestablished, there is no significant reduction in a margin of safety. The containment boundary valves being added are closed when the reactor is at power, and are opened only after the reactor is shut down. The boundary valves being deleted are open only during plant heatup. The subject boundary valves are manual containment isolation valves, and the current specification allows them to be repositioned under administrative control without compensatory measures to isolate the penetration. The staff therefore concludes that implementation of the proposed change would not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Wiscasset Public Library, High Street, P.O. Box 367, Wiscasset, Maine 04578 Attorney for licensee: Mary Ann Lynch, Esquire, Maine Yankee Atomic Power Company, 83 Edison Drive, Augusta, Maine 04336 NRC Project Director: Walter R. Butler Northeast Nuclear Energy Company (NNECO), Docket No. 50-245, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit 1, New London County, Connecticut Date of amendment request: April 29, 1994 Description of amendment request: The amendment would change the requirement for reactor operators (RO) in Table 6.2-1 from 2 to 3 for the RUN, STARTUP/HOT STANDBY and HOT SHUTDOWN conditions. In addition, two typographical corrections are made to page 6-4. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: NNECO has reviewed the proposed changes in accordance with 10CFR50.92 and concluded that the changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration (SHC). The basis for this conclusion is that the three criteria of 10CFR50.92(c) are not compromised. The proposed changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration because the changes would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously analyzed. Accident analyses for Millstone Unit No. 1 do not require a specific number of operators. Increasing the Technical Specification minimum to require a third RO does not decrease the effectiveness of the shift staff in response to normal or abnormal conditions. In fact, the third RO enhances the ability of the operating crew to mitigate complex transients which could occur during beyond design basis events. The shifts have trained and functioned at the higher staffing level for several years. The typographical corrections to page 6-4 provide a clearer representation of the required actions, and do not affect the intent nor implementation of the specification. Therefore, the proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of a previously analyzed accident. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. The addition of a third RO to the minimum shift-crew composition required by Technical Specification Table 6.2-1 does not affect the operation of the unit, nor does it change any of the operating procedures, off-normal procedures, or EOPs [emergency operating procedures]. Staffing the control room with an additional operator enhances the capability of the operating crew to mitigate transients. Therefore, addition of a third RO to the minimum shift-crew composition cannot create the possibility of a new or different accident. 3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The proposed addition of a third reactor operator is to ensure that sufficient operating staff is available to respond to complex transients involving multiple equipment failures. Ensuring that sufficient resources are available to cope with beyond design basis event scenarios provides an increase in the margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resources Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Attorney for licensee: Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry & Howard, Counselors at Law, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-336, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 2, New London County, Connecticut Date of amendment request: May 6, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would modify the Limiting Conditions for Operation (LCO) for the Millstone Unit 2 Technical Specifications 3.8.2.3 and 3.8.2.4 and the surveillance requirement of TS 4.8.2.3.2.c.3. These changes relate to the amperage requirements and the charging capability of the DC distribution systems. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: The proposed changes do not involve an SHC [significant hazards consideration] because the changes would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously analyzed. In 1993, revised battery and battery charger sizing calculations demonstrated that a charger capacity of 400 amperes is sufficient to provide the continuous DC loads, and is capable of recharging a fully discharged station battery in a timely manner consistent with the design basis discussed in Section 8.5.3.1 of the Millstone Unit No. 2 FSAR [Final Safety Analysis Report]. The calculations determined that the largest continuous load was 154 amperes; therefore, 400 amperes of charging capacity could provide 246 amperes to recharge a battery. The calculations conservatively demonstrated that this charging capacity could recharge a battery in 10.37 hours. This recharging time is well within the 12-hour recharging time discussed in Section 8.5.3.1 of the Millstone Unit No. 2 FSAR. Additionally, this recharging time is more conservative than the 24-hour recharging time stated in Section 8.3.2 of the original Safety Evaluation for Millstone Unit No. 2. Therefore, the proposed changes do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously analyzed. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. The proposed LCO and surveillance changes do not alter the existing DC bus configuration, as described in Section 8.5.3.1 of the Millstone Unit No. 2 FSAR. This bus configuration has been previously analyzed, and was found acceptable. The proposed changes also meet the recharging time specified in the design basis. Therefore, the proposed changes do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. 3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. In 1993, revised battery and battery charger sizing calculations demonstrated that a charger capacity of 400 amperes is sufficient to provide the continuous DC loads, and is capable of recharging a fully discharged station battery in a timely manner consistent with the design basis discussed in Section 8.5.3.1 of the Millstone Unit No. 2 FSAR. The calculations determined that the largest continuous load was 154 amperes; therefore, 400 amperes of charging capacity could provide 246 amperes to recharge a battery. The calculations conservatively demonstrated that this charging capacity could recharge a battery in 10.37 hours. This recharging time is well within the 12-hour recharging time discussed in Section 8.5.3.1 of the Millstone Unit No. 2 FSAR. Additionally, this recharging time is more conservative than the 24-hour recharging time stated in Section 8.3.2 of the original Safety Evaluation for Millstone Unit No. 2. Therefore, the proposed changes do not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Attorney for licensee: Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry & Howard, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-336, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 2, New London County, Connecticut Date of amendment request: May 6, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would provide additional Technical Specification requirements regarding non-Quality Assurance (QA) equipment utilized to achieve feedwater isolation in response to a main steam line break (MSLB) inside containment. Specifically the amendment would incorporate additional sections numbered 3/4.7.1.6, titled ``Plant Systems - Main Feedwater Isolation Components (MFICs);'' 3/4.8.2.1A, titled '' Onsite Power Distribution Systems - A.C. Distribution - Operating;'' and 3/4.8.2.5, titled ``Onsite Power Distribution Systems (Turbine Battery) - D.C. Distribution - Operating.'' In addition, the proposed amendment would modify the Index and the Bases to reflect the additional requirements. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: NNECO has reviewed the proposed changes in accordance with 10CFR50.90 and has concluded that the changes do not involve a significant hazards consideration (SHC). The basis for this conclusion is that the three criteria of 10CFR50.92(c) are not compromised. The proposed changes do not involve an SHC because the changes would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously analyzed. Currently, the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications contain response time requirements for the feedwater isolation valves to ensure rapid isolation of feedwater to the steam generators and to maintain the peak containment pressure below the containment design pressure of 54 psig. However, clear Action Statements specifying operability requirements for the non-QA equipment associated with feedwater isolation are not included within the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications. NNECO's proposal to add sections 3/4.7.1.6, 3/4.8.2.1A, and 3/4.8.2.5 into the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications will incorporate additional requirements regarding components that are credited to provide feedwater isolation in the event of an MSLB inside containment. These proposed changes will impose additional limitations, restrictions, and controls not currently in place in the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications. Additionally, NNECO's proposals to modify the Bases and the Index of the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications will: 1) provide personnel with information concerning the additional requirements, and 2) correct an editorial error. These proposed changes to the Bases and the Index do not alter the manner in which equipment is operated, nor do they affect equipment availability. Based on the above, the proposed license amendment does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously analyzed. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. NNECO's proposal to add section 3/4.7.1.6, 3/4.8.2.1A, and 3/4.8.2.5 into the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications will incorporate additional requirements regarding components that are credited to provide feedwater isolation in the event of an MSLB inside containment. These proposed changes will impose additional limitations, restrictions, and controls not currently in place in the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications. Additionally, NNECO's proposals to modify the Bases and the Index of the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications will: 1) provide personnel with information concerning the additional requirements, and 2) correct an editorial error. These proposed changes to the Bases an the Index do not alter the manner in which equipment is operated, nor do they affect equipment availability. Based on the above, the proposed license amendment cannot create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. NNECO's proposal to add sections 3/4.7.1.6, 3/4.8.2.1A, and 3/4.8.2.5 into the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications will incorporate additional requirements regarding components that are credited to provide feedwater isolation in the event of an MSLB inside containment. These proposed changes will impose additional limitations, restrictions, and controls not currently in place in the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications. Additionally, NNECO's proposals to modify the Bases and the Index of the Millstone Unit No. 2 Technical Specifications will: 1) provide personnel with information concerning the additional requirements, and 2) correct an editorial error. These proposed changes to the Bases and the Index do not alter the manner in which equipment is operated, nor do they affect equipment availability. Therefore, this proposed license amendment does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. In fact. The margin of safety will be increased due to the imposition of restriction on the non-QA equipment credited for feedwater isolation in the event of an MSLB inside containment. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Attorney for licensee: Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry & Howard, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-423, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut Date of amendment request: May 6, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment modifies the monthly operational test of the reactor trip bypass breakers to monthly staggered, such that each breaker is tested every 62 days. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: The proposed changes do not involve an SHC [significant hazards consideration] because the changes would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Revising the technical specifications to require a staggered monthly surveillance operational test of the reactor trip bypass breakers (such that each breaker is tested every 62 days) will only make operational testing of the reactor trip bypass breakers consistent with operational testing of the trip breakers and the automatic trip and interlock logic. It will also reduce cycling of the reactor trip bypass breakers by eliminating the requirement to test both bypass breakers during the monthly surveillance, thereby reducing maintenance and surveillance time. The proposed changes do not affect any of the design basis accidents nor are there any malfunctions associated with these changes. Additionally, this technical specification bases change only clarifies both the meaning of a reactor trip breaker and trip breaker train which have been included for completeness and clarity concerning the reactor trip breaker system. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident previously evaluated. Revising the technical specifications to require a staggered monthly surveillance operational test of the reactor trip bypass breakers (such that each breaker is tested every 62 days) will only make operational testing of the reactor trip bypass breakers consistent with operational testing of the reactor trip breakers and the automatic trip and interlock logic. There are no new failure modes associated with the proposed changes. Since the plant will continue to operate as designed, the proposed changes will not modify the plant response to the point where it can be considered a new accident. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Revising the technical specifications to require a staggered monthly surveillance operational test of the reactor trip bypass breakers (such that each breaker is tested ever 62 days) will only make operational testing of the reactor trip bypass breakers consistent with operational testing of the reactor trip breakers and the automatic trip and interlock logic. It will also reduce cycling of the reactor trip bypass breakers by eliminating the requirement to test both bypass breakers during the monthly surveillance, thereby reducing maintenance and surveillance time. The proposed changes do not have any adverse impact on the protective boundaries nor do they affect the consequences of any accident previously analyzed. The surveillance requirements will still ensure that the reactor trip breakers and the reactor trip bypass breakers are tested and within the limits. Therefore, the proposed changes will not impact the margin of safety as designated in the bases of any technical specification. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Attorney for licensee: Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry & Howard, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-423, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut Date of amendment request: May 18, 1994 Description of amendment request: The amendment would change operability requirements for the Fuel Building Exhaust Filter System to require it to be operable whenever irradiated fuel is in the spent fuel pool, which has had less than 60 days of decay time. Surveillance requirements for the Fuel Building Exhaust Filter System would be changed to require that the system be tested and verified operable at no greater than 31 days prior to its required usage. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: ...The proposed change does not involve an SHC [significant hazards consideration] because the change would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed modification will revise the period of time during which the Fuel Building Exhaust Filter System must be operable. The propose[d] change will require that the system is operable whenever irradiated fuel, which has decayed less than 60 days, is in the spent fuel pool. Currently, the system is required to be operable whenever a load is moved over the pool or fuel is being moved in the pool. The modification has no effect on the probability of a fuel handling accident. The consequences of a fuel handling accident has been evaluated at two intervals. The first time is the minimum decay time. At this time (t=100 hours) with irradiated fuel in the pool, the Fuel Building Exhaust Filter System is required, per the existing and the proposed Technical Specification, to be operable. Therefore, the consequences of an accident are identical to that described in the FSAR [Final Safety Analyses Report]. The second scenario evaluated is when the filters are initially isolated (t=60 days). The resultant offsite dose, assuming no filtration and lower core inventory due to decay, are significantly lower than was calculated at t=100 hours. Therefore, the existing accident analysis in FSAR Section 15.7.4 is limiting and the proposed modification will not impact the probability or consequences of an accident. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. The proposed change does not impact any system or component which could cause a fuel handling accident. The Fuel Building Exhaust Filter System is used for accident mitigations. It's failure cannot, in any way, create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed change to the Fuel Building Exhaust Filter System has been analyzed at the two most critical times. The first analysis was done when the fuel is first placed in the pool, and the second analysis was done when the filtration system is isolated. The first event resulted in no change in assumptions in the analysis presented in the FSAR, ergo no change in dose. The second event has been analyzed and doses have decreased, when compared to the first event. The system will be verified operable per the performance of Surveillance Requirement 4.9.12a prior to fuel or load movement over the pool. Therefore, there is no reduction in the margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Attorney for licensee: Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry & Howard, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-352 and 50-353, Limerick Generating Station, Units 1 and 2, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania Date of amendment request: May 13, 1994 Description of amendment request: This amendment would revise Technical Specifications Surveillance Requirement 4.8.1.1.2e.8, which requires that an emergency diesel generator be retested within 5 minutes after completing a 24-hour endurance run. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. The proposed Technical Specifications (TS) change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed TS change would revise the Emergency Diesel Generator (EDG) surveillance criteria to allow the hot restart test to be performed independent of the Engineered Safety Features (ESF) load sequencing test and the 24 hour endurance run. The proposed surveillance requirements would continue to demonstrate that the objectives of each of these tests are met. Specifically, the EDG's are shown to be capable of starting the ESF loads in the required sequence, operating at full load for an extended period of time, and restarting from a full load temperature condition. Therefore, the proposed changes would not adversely affect the EDG's ability to support mitigation of the consequences of any previously evaluated accident. The proposed changes to the surveillance requirements do not affect the initiation or progression of any accident sequence. Therefore, the proposed change does not involve an increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. The proposed TS change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. This proposed TS change does not require physical changes to the plant or equipment, and does not impact any design or functional requirements of the Emergency Diesel Generators (EDGs). The proposed change affects surveillance test criteria such that increased scheduling flexibility is allowed while the test objectives associated with demonstrating EDG operability continue to be met. The proposed changes do not allow any plant configurations that are presently prohibited by the Technical Specifications. Therefore, the proposed TS change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. 3. The proposed TS change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed TS change does not involve a change to the physical design or functional requirements of the Emergency Diesel Generators (EDGs). Surveillance testing in accordance with the proposed Technical Specification will continue to demonstrate the ability of the EDG's to perform their intended function of providing electrical power to ESF systems needed to mitigate design basis transients, consistent with the plant safety analyses. The margin of safety demonstrated by the plant safety analyses is therefore not affected by the proposed change. Therefore, the proposed TS change does not involve a reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Pottstown Public Library, 500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. Attorney for licensee: J. W. Durham, Sr., Esquire, Sr. V. P. and General Counsel, Philadelphia Electric Company, 2301 Market Street, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania 19101 NRC Project Director: Charles L. Miller Philadelphia Electric Company, Public Service Electric and Gas Company, Delmarva Power and Light Company, and Atlantic City Electric Company, Docket No. 50-277, Peach Bottom Atomic Power Station, Unit No. 2, York County, Pennsylvania Date of application for amendment: May 13, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would extend the Type A test (i.e., Containment Integrated Leak Rate Test) interval on a one-time basis. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. The proposed Technical Specifications (TS) change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The accidents which are potentially negatively impacted by the proposed change are any Loss of Coolant Accident (LOCA) inside primary containment as described in the PBAPS [Peach Bottom Atomic Power Station], Units 2 and 3 UFSAR [Updated Final Safety Analysis Report]. The proposed change increases the surveillance interval of the 10 CFR [Part] 50, Appendix J Type A test (i.e., Containment Integrated Leakage Rate Test (CILRT)) from 42 months to 66 months. This test is performed to determine that the total leakage from containment does not exceed the maximum allowable primary containment leakage rate (i.e., designated La) at a calculated peak containment internal pressure (Pa), as defined in 10 CFR [Part] 50, Appendix J. The primary containment limits the leakage of radioactive material during and following design bases accidents in order to comply with the offsite dose limits specified in 10 CFR [Part] 100. Accordingly, the primary containment is not an accident initiator, it is an accident mitigator. No physical or operational changes to the containment structure, plant systems, or components would be made as a result of the proposed change. Therefore, the probability of occurrence of an accident previously evaluated is not increased. The failure effects that are potentially created by the proposed one-time TS change have been considered. The relevant components important to safety which are potentially affected are the containment structure, plant systems, and containment penetrations. There are no physical or operational changes to any plant equipment associated with the proposed TS change. Therefore, the probability or consequences of a malfunction of equipment important to safety is not increased. The proposed change introduces the possibility that primary containment leakage in excess of the allowable value (i.e., La) would remain undetected during the proposed 24 month extension of the interval between the second and third Type A test. The types of mechanisms which could cause degradation of the primary containment can be categorized into two types. These are: 1) degradation due to work which is performed as part of a modification or maintenance activity on a component or system (i.e., activity-based), or; 2) degradation resulting from a time-based failure mechanism. A review of activity-based failure mechanisms has determined that the potential from degradation due to activity based mechanisms is minimal. Regarding the potential for primary containment degradation due to a time-based mechanism, we have concluded that the PBAPS Local Leak Rate Test (LLRT) program would identify most types of penetration leakage. The LLRT program involves measurement of leakage from Type B and Type C primary containment penetrations as defined in 10 CFR [Part] 50, Appendix J. The 10 CFR [Part] 50, Appendix J, Type B tests are intended to detect local leaks and to measure leakage across pressure containing or leakage-limiting boundaries other than valves, such as containment penetrations incorporating resilient seals, gaskets, expansion bellows, flexible seal assemblies, door operating mechanism penetrations that are part of the containment system, doors, and hatches. 10 CFR [Part] 50, Appendix J, Type C testing is intended to measure reactor system primary containment isolation valve leakage rates. The frequency of the Type B and Type C testing is not being altered by the proposed TS change. [However, in an April 18, 1994 letter, the licensee has requested a 60-day extension of the Type B and Type C testing.] The acceptance criterion for Type B and Type C leakage is 0.6 La (i.e., 0.3 % wt/day) which, when compared to the Type A test acceptance criterion of 0.75 La (i.e., 0.375 % wt/day), is a significant portion of the Type A test allowable leakage. The proposed TS change only extends the interval between two consecutive Type A tests. The Type B and Type C tests will be performed as required. The Type B and Type C tests will continue to be used to confirm that the containment isolation valves and penetrations have not degraded. Containment system components that would not be tested are the containment structure itself and small diameter instrumentation lines. Time-based degradation of any of the instrumentation lines would most likely be identified by faulty instrument indication or during instrument calibrations that will be performed during the PBAPS, Unit 2 refueling outage 10. In examining the potential for a time-based failure mechanism that could cause significant degradation of the containment structure, we concluded that the risk, if any, of such a mechanism is small since the design requirements and fabrication specifications established for the containment structure are in themselves adequate to ensure containment leak tight integrity. Based on the above evaluation, we have concluded that the proposed TS change will have a negligible impact on the consequences of any accident previously evaluated. To support this conclusion, a review of the PBAPS, Unit 2 CILRT history was performed. This review identified that the only failure mechanism that has been detected during the past CILRTs is an activity based component failure, and that there is no indication of any time-based degradation that would not be identified during performance of Type B and Type C tests. Although this review concluded that the risk of undetected primary containment degradation is not increased, the Individual Plant Examination (IPE) for PBAPS, Units 2 and 3, was also reviewed in order to assess the impact of exceeding the primary containment allowable leakage rate, if a non-mechanistic activity type (i.e., time-based) failure were to occur. The IPE included an evaluation of the effect of various containment leakage sizes under different scenarios. The IPE results showed that a containment leakage rate of 35% wt/day would represent less than a 5% increase in risk to the public being exposed to radiation. This evaluation was based on a study performed by Oak Ridge National Laboratory for light water reactors that evaluated the impact of leakage rates on public risk. As stated earlier, the current value of La for PBAPS, Unit 2, is 0.5% wt/day, which is significantly less than the 35% wt/day discussed in the IPE evaluation. Therefore, the proposed TS change involving a one-time extension of the Type A test interval and performing the third Type A test after the second Appendix J 10-year service period will not involve an increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. The proposed TS change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. The proposed change is an increase of a surveillance test interval and does not make any physical or operational changes to existing plant systems or components. Primary containment acts as an accident mitigator not initiator. Therefore, the possibility of a different type of accident than any previously evaluated or the possibility of a different type of equipment malfunction is not introduced. Therefore, the proposed TS change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. 3. The proposed TS change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The total primary containment leakage rate ensures that the total containment leakage volume will not exceed the value assumed in the safety analyses at the peak accident pressure. As an added conservatism, the measured overall leakage rate is further limited to less than or equal to 0.75 La during performance of periodic tests to account for possible degradation of the containment leakage barriers between leakage tests. There is the potential that containment degradation could remain undetected during the proposed 24 month surveillance interval extension and result in the containment leakage exceeding the allowable value assumed in safety analysis. A review of activity-based failure mechanisms has determined that the potential from degradation due to activity based mechanisms is minimal. Regarding the potential for primary containment degradation due to a time-based mechanism, we have concluded that the PBAPS Local Leak Rate Test (LLRT) program would identify most types of penetration leakage. The LLRT program involves measurement of leakage from Type B and Type C primary containment penetrations as defined in 10 CFR [Part] 50, Appendix J. The 10 CFR [Part] 50, Appendix J, Type B tests are intended to detect local leaks and to measure leakage across pressure containing or leakage-limiting boundaries other than valves, such as containment penetrations incorporating resilient seals, gaskets, expansion bellows, flexible seal assemblies, door operating mechanism penetrations that are part of the containment system, doors, and hatches. 10 CFR [Part] 50, Appendix J, Type C testing is intended to measure reactor system primary containment isolation valve leakage rates. The frequency of the Type B and Type C testing is not being altered by the proposed TS change. Finally, a review of the results of previous PBAPS, Unit 2 CILRT results concluded that the only failure mechanism which has been detected during the past CILRTs is activity-based and that there is no indication of time-based failures that would not be identified during performance of Type B and Type C tests. Therefore, we have concluded that the proposed extended test interval would not result in a non-detectable PBAPS, Unit 2 primary containment leakage rate in excess of the allowable value (i.e., 0.5% wt/day) established by the TS and 10 CFR [Part] 50, Appendix J. Therefore, the proposed TS change does not involve a reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room Location: Government Publications Section, State Library of Pennsylvania, (REGIONAL DEPOSITORY) Education Building, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box 1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105. Attorney for licensee: J. W. Durham, Sr., Esquire, Sr. V. P. and General Counsel, Philadelphia Electric Company, 2301 Market Street, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania 19101 NRC Project Director: Charles L. Miller South Carolina Electric & Gas Company, South Carolina Public Service Authority, Docket No. 50-395, Virgil C. Summer Nuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Fairfield County, South Carolina Date of amendment request: March 11, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would reduce the allowed outage time for the residual heat removal (RHR) suction relief valves (SRVs) in accordance with the guidance of Generic Letter (GL) 90-06. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration which is presented below: 1. The probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated is not significantly increased. This change decreases the allowed outage time of a Low Temperature Overpressure Protection (LTOP) system. There is no hardware, software, or operating methodology change, so there is no increase in probability or consequences. Since the time allowed for one train of this equipment to be inoperable is shorter, the probability of an overpressure event not being mitigated has also been reduced. The consequences will not change unless the system or operation of the system changes. 2. [The proposed change will not] [c]reate the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. As this proposed change will not involve any changes to hardware, software, or operating practices, it cannot create any possibility of new or different kinds of accidents from those previously analyzed. The RHR SRVs are intended to provide protection against a rupture of a pressure boundary from an over-pressure condition which has the potential to result in core uncovery. The original design basis of the plant complies with the requirements of 10 CFR 50 Appendix G and uses the RHR SRVs to meet the fracture toughness requirements of 10 CFR 50 Appendix G. This change only increases the availability of this protection and does not create any new or different kinds of accidents. 3. [The proposed amendment does not] [i]nvolve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. SCE&G already has administrative controls in place to minimize the possibility of an overpressure event occurring as well as to assure that there are two trains of LTOP equipment operable during the modes when the potential exists for this event. There are controls to preclude the inadvertent start-up of a Reactor Coolant Pump or Charging Pump and controls to ensure that both RHR Suction Isolation Valves for each train are open and remain open except for testing and maintenance. This alignment is maintained until the RHR System is realigned for its ECCS function. These controls are proceduralized in plant operating procedures. This change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety as nothing is changed which affects the margin in a negative direction. The decrease in AOT actually increases the margin since the allowed time for one train to be inoperable has been reduced. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Fairfield County Library, Garden and Washington Streets, Winnsboro, South Carolina 29180 Attorney for licensee: Randolph R. Mahan, South Carolina Electric & Gas Company, Post Office Box 764, Columbia, South Carolina 29218 NRC Project Director: William H. Bateman Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, Sequoyah Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee Date of amendment request: May 16, 1994 (TS 94-03) Description of amendment request: The proposed change would remove Table 3.3-2, ``Reactor Trip System Instrumentation Response Times,'' and Table 3.3-5, ``Engineered Safety Features Response Times,'' from the technical specifications and incorporate the limits into the Updated Final Safety Analysis Report. In addition, references to these tables in Specifications 3.3.1.1, 3.3.2.1, and 4.3.1.1.3 (for Unit 1) and 3.3.1, 3.3.2, and 4.3.1.1.3 (for Unit 2) would be removed. A footnote would be added to Specification 4.3.1.1.3 indicating that neutron detectors are exempt from response time testing. These changes have been proposed in accordance with Generic Letter 93-08. A change to the Bases would indicate that the response time limits would be maintained in the Updated Final Safety Analysis Report. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: TVA has evaluated the proposed technical specification (TS) change and has determined that it does not represent a significant hazards consideration based on criteria established in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Operation of Sequoyah Nuclear Plant (SQN) in accordance with the proposed amendment will not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed change does not alter the response time limit requirements for the reactor trip or engineered safety feature actuation systems or surveillance testing and frequency. Placing these limits in the Updated Final Safety Analysis Report (UFSAR) will ensure the plant design basis is maintained in accordance with 10 CFR 50.59. Since no actual changes to response time limits or surveillance requirements are involved, the probability or consequences of an accident are not increased. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. The proposed changes does not affect any plant equipment, functions, or setpoint by relocating response time limits to the UFSAR. Therefore, the possibility of a new or different kind of accident is not created. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed change will continue to require SQN to maintain the plant functions at the required setpoints necessary for the design basis and to support the accident analysis. The margin of safety is not reduced because there is no change to plant functions and the 10 CFR 50.59 process will continue to ensure the plant design basis is appropriately maintained. The NRC has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Chattanooga-Hamilton County Library, 1101 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402 Attorney for licensee: General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority, 400 West Summit Hill Drive, ET 11H, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902 NRC Project Director: Frederick J. Hebdon Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, Sequoyah Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee Date of amendment request: May 18, 1994 (TS 94-05) Description of amendment request: The proposed change would add a note to the action statement for Limiting Condition for Operation 3.7.7, ``Control Room Emergency Ventilation System,'' indicating that the provisions of TS 3.0.3 are not applicable while performing actions associated with a tornado warning. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: TVA has evaluated the proposed technical specification (TS) change and has determined that it does not represent a significant hazards consideration based on criteria established in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Operation of Sequoyah Nuclear Plant (SQN) in accordance with the proposed amendment will not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The control room emergency ventilation system (CREVS) was designed to ensure control room habitability during accident conditions. The design basis of SQN does not include an accident creating a contaminated air condition concurrent with a tornado. The ability of the CREVS to perform its design function has not been affected by this change. The proposed change will not increase the possibility or consequences of an accident. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. An accident involving a contaminated air condition and a tornado have been analyzed as part of the SQN design basis. Both accidents are assumed to occur independently. This change does not create a new or different accident not previously analyzed. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The design basis of the CREVS is not impacted by this TS change. There is no change in any assumptions made in the Final Safety Analysis Report. Therefore, there is no reduction in the margin of safety as a result of this change. The NRC has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Chattanooga-Hamilton County Library, 1101 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402 Attorney for licensee: General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority, 400 West Summit Hill Drive, ET 11H, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902 NRC Project Director: Frederick J. Hebdon Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, Sequoyah Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee Date of amendment request: March 19, 1994; superseded May 16, 1994 (TS 93-04) Description of amendment request: The proposed change would clarify and consolidate the technical specifications (TS) regarding the dual function of the containment vacuum relief system (i.e., the vacuum relief and containment isolation functions). The proposed changes would revise TS 3/4.6.6, ``Vacuum Relief Valves,'' to indicate the actions that would be required should one or more vacuum relief (VR) lines be incapable of performing its containment isolation function or incapable of performing its VR function. In addition, the testing requirements would be revised to add specific requirements and reflect the inservice test (IST) program by relocating the testing requirements from TS 4.6.3.2.d and Table 3.6-2 to the new TS 4.6.6 (and to Sequoyah's IST program). Other proposed changes affect Bases 3/4.6.6 section and TS index pages to reflect the proposed changes indicated above. This proposed change was originally noticed on May 12, 1993 (58 FR 28060), which is superseded by this notice. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: TVA has evaluated the proposed technical specification (TS) change and has determined that it does not represent a significant hazards consideration based on criteria established in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Operation of Sequoyah Nuclear Plant (SQN) in accordance with the proposed amendment will not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. TVA's proposed changes do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed change does not increase the probability of an accident since the proposed change does not affect any plant systems, equipment, or components. The dual design functions of SQN's containment vacuum relief (VR) system (i.e., provide containment VR and containment isolation) are not affected. The consequences of an event are not significantly increased by the proposed increase in allowed outage time from 4 hours to 72 hours for returning an inoperable VR system to operable status. The probability of an event during the relatively short duration of the TS completion times, in conjunction with the redundancy provided in the design of the system, provide sufficient assurance that the VR lines are available for mitigating an accident or abnormal event. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. No physical modification is being made to any plant hardware or plant operating setpoints, limits, or operating procedures as a result of this change. TVA's proposed change provides a TS improvement that clarifies the TS requirements associated with the dual design function of SQN's VR system. The proposed change removes the potential for creating a conflict between Specification 3/4.6.3, ``Containment Isolation Valves,'' and Specification 3/4.6.6, ``Vacuum Relief Valves.'' The proposed change does not alter any accident analysis or any assumptions used to support the accident analyses. The containment leakage assumptions used to determine offsite dose limits for compliance with 10 CFR 100 are not affected. The analysis that supports the containment VR system also remains unchanged. The proposed 72-hour and 1-hour completion times for returning an inoperable VR line to operable status are consistent with the NUREG-1431 and NUREG-1433. Consequently, the proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The margin of safety provided by the design of SQN's containment VR system remains unchanged. TVA's proposed change does not affect the VR function or the containment isolation function that currently exists in SQN TSs. The proposed change eliminates the potential for conflicting requirements within SQN TSs and ensures that the proper action is taken to preserve these dual design functions while the plant is in Modes 1, 2, 3, or 4. TVA's proposed change provides a TS improvement that combines these functional requirements into a single specification. Both VR and containment isolation requirements will continue to be provided. Accordingly, the proposed change does not involve a reduction in the margin of safety. The NRC has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Chattanooga-Hamilton County Library,1101 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402 Attorney for licensee: General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority, 400 West Summit Hill Drive, ET 11H, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902 NRC Project Director: Frederick J. Hebdon TU Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-445 and 50-446, Comanche Peak Steam Electric Station, Units 1 and 2, Somervell County, Texas Date of amendment request: February 14, 1993 Brief description of amendments: The proposed amendments would revise the Comanche Peak Steam Electric Station (CPSES), Units 1 and 2, technical specifications (TS) by (1) changing the allowable value for Unit 2 overtemperature N-16 and pressurizer pressure-low setpoints, (2) deleting Equation 2.2-1 from TS 2.2.1, and (3) administrative changes. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. The proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of a previously evaluated accident. Overtemperature N-16, Unit 2 Incorporation of the increased temperature uncertainties reported by Rosemount will change the Allowable Value of the Overtemperature N-16 trip function. The change does not affect the Safety Analysis Limits assumed in the accident analysis. Because the change only impacts the Allowable Value for a setpoint and does not affect any system designs or operations, the change does not increase the probability of an accident. Although the Allowable Value is changed in the conservative direction, the change assures that, considering the newly identified transmitter uncertainty, the trip actuates prior to the conditions assumed in the accident analyses. As such, there is no impact on the consequences of any accidents previously evaluated. Pressurizer Pressure - Low, Unit 2 The added uncertainties change the Allowable Value of the Unit 2 Pressurizer Pressure-Low Reactor Trip function. The change does not affect the Safety Analysis Limits assumed in the accident analysis. Because the change only impacts the Allowable Value for a setpoint and does not affect the system design or operations, the change does not increase the probability of an accident. Although the Allowable Value is changed in the conservative direction, the change assures that, considering the newly identified transmitter uncertainty, the trip actuates prior to the conditions assumed for the accident analyses. As such, there is no impact on the consequences of any accidents previously evaluated. Equation 2.2-1 The changes to Specifications 2.2.1 and 3.3.2, to Tables 2.2-1 and 3.3-3, and to the bases sections will require recalibration of the channel and removal of any accumulated errors in any function whose ``as found'' setpoint is found to be less conservative than its allowable value. These changes delete a potentially less conservative option and will result in actual channel operation closer to the nominal setpoint and within the allowable value band. These changes will in effect validate one of the assumptions made in the accident analysis and will not increase the probability or consequences of any accident evaluated in the Safety Analysis Report. Administrative Changes The changes to combine the Unit 1 and Unit 2 line items into a dual Unit line if the Trip Setpoint and Allowable Value values are the same is administrative and meant as a human factors improvement for operator convenience. The change does not affect the operation of any equipment, the operating point of any equipment, nor any equipment hardware and thus does not increase the probability or consequences of any accident evaluated in the Safety Analysis Report. 2. The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed accident. Overtemperature N-16 and Pressurizer Pressure - Low, Unit 2 As the proposed amendment changes only the Unit 2 Allowable Values of the Overtemperature N-16 reactor trip and the Pressurizer Pressure-Low reactor trip and does not have any physical effect on the transmitter or circuitry, there are no new or different types of accident introduced. Equation 2.2-1 Deletion of this equation and its associated action statements, definitions and values does not introduce any physical changes to any systems, structures, or components. The change merely assures that setpoints which are less conservative than their Allowable Value are recalibrated prior to being declared operable. These changes do not introduce any new credible failure modes which may create the possibility of a new or different accident. Administrative Changes Combining line items for Unit 1 and Unit 2 into a dual Unit entry for administrative purposes does not introduce any new credible failure modes which may create the possibility of a new or different accident. 3. The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. Overtemperature N-16 and Pressurizer Pressure - Low, Unit 2 Incorporation of the added temperature uncertainties of the Rosemount transmitters assures that the safety analysis limits assumed in the accident analyses for Overtemperature N-16 and Pressurizer Pressure-Low reactor trip functions for Unit 2 are met. There is no change in the acceptance criteria or the results of these analyses due to this change. Thus there is no effect on the margin of safety. Equation 2.2-1 Deletion of Equation 2.2-1, related actions and associated definitions and values, merely eliminates one option to assure that the safety analysis assumptions are met. This option is not presently in use and the accident analyses assumptions have been and will continue to be met using the other option (to re-calibrate channels prior to restoring operability). Thus the margin of safety is unaffected. Administrative Changes Combining the Unit 1 and Unit 2 line items of Table 2.2-1 for RTS [Reactor Trip Systems] functions and of Table 3.3-3 for ESFAS [Engineered Safety Features Actuation System] functions into dual unit entries does not change the Trip Setpoint or the Allowable Value for the functions. The margin of safety is unaffected. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: University of Texas at Arlington Library, Government Publications/Maps, 701 South Cooper, P.O. Box 19497, Arlington, Texas 76019 Attorney for licensee: George L. Edgar, Esq., Newman and Holtzinger, 1615 L Street, N.W., Suite 1000, Washington, D.C. 20036 NRC Project Director: William D. Beckner Wolf Creek Nuclear Operating Corporation, Docket No. 50-482, Wolf Creek Generating Station, Coffey County, Kansas Date of amendment request: April 19, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment revises Technical Specification 6.2.2.g to reflect a title designation change within the Wolf Creek Nuclear Operating Corporation (WCNOC) organization. The title of Supervisor Operations is being changed to Assistant Manager Operations. The title change does not represent any change in reporting relationships, job responsibilities, or overall organizational commitments. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. The proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. This change involves an administrative change to the WCNOC organization and to the position title and as such has no effect on plant equipment or the technical qualification of plant personnel. 2. The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. This change is administrative in nature and does not involve any change to installed plant systems or the overall operating philosophy of Wolf Creek Generating Station. 3. The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. This change does not involve any changes in overall organizational commitments. A position title change alone does not reduce any margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room locations: Emporia State University, William Allen White Library, 1200 Commercial Street, Emporia, Kansas 66801 and Washburn University School of Law Library, Topeka, Kansas 66621 Attorney for licensee: Jay Silberg, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20037 NRC Project Director: Theodore R. Quay Wolf Creek Nuclear Operating Corporation, Docket No. 50-482, Wolf Creek Generating Station, Coffey County, Kansas Date of amendment request: April 19, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment revises Technical Specification Table 3.6-1, ``Containment Isolation Valves,'' by deleting reference to two (2) valves. The Technical Specification change reflects a planned modification which removes the essential service water (ESW) containment air cooler return line isolation valve bypass valves and associated piping. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. The proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. After the design modification is completed the ESW Containment Penetrations will be provided with stainless steel isolation valves, which will be provided with automatic SIS [safety injection signal] actuation signals to open automatically to provide required cooling water flow to the Containment Air Coolers following a LOCA [loss-of-coolant accident] or MSLB [main steamline break]. Replacement of the current carbon steel isolation valves with stainless steel valves and removing the unnecessary bypass lines and bypass isolation valves will reduce the amount of seat leakage currently experienced with these valves. The probability of occurrence of a previously evaluated accident is not increased because this modification does not introduce any new potential accident initiating conditions. The consequences of an accident previously evaluated is not increased because the ability of containment to restrict the release of any fission product radioactivity to the environment will not be degraded by this modification. 2. The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. The proposed modification will reduce the number of containment isolation valves and replace several carbon steel isolation valves with stainless steel valves, which will be less susceptible to erosion and corrosion. Thus, potential system leakage will be reduced by this modification, while valve reliability will be enhanced. The new valves are designed to the original ESW System requirements, and removal of the bypass lines and bypass isolation valves will not result in a malfunction of any other plant equipment. Therefore, this proposed modification will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. 3. The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The removal of the bypass lines and bypass isolation valves will not adversely affect containment isolation capability for credible accident scenarios. Due to a previous design change, the bypass lines are no longer required to ensure adequate cooling flow to the Containment Air Coolers. In addition, the operability and reliability of the remaining isolation valves will be enhanced by replacing the current carbon steel valves with stainless steel valves. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room locations: Emporia State University, William Allen White Library, 1200 Commercial Street, Emporia, Kansas 66801 and Washburn University School of Law Library, Topeka, Kansas 66621 Attorney for licensee: Jay Silberg, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20037 NRC Project Director: Theodore R. Quay Previously Published Notices Of Consideration Of Issuance Of Amendments To Facility Operating Licenses, Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determination, And Opportunity For A Hearing The following notices were previously published as separate individual notices. The notice content was the same as above. They were published as individual notices either because time did not allow the Commission to wait for this biweekly notice or because the action involved exigent circumstances. They are repeated here because the biweekly notice lists all amendments issued or proposed to be issued involving no significant hazards consideration. For details, see the individual notice in the Federal Register on the day and page cited. This notice does not extend the notice period of the original notice. Carolina Power & Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-400, Shearon Harris Nuclear Power Plant, Unit 1, Wake and Chatham Counties, North Carolina Date of amendment request: May 11, 1994 Brief description of amendment request: The amendment would allow reduced power operation as a function of reactor coolant system (RCS) total flow rate for flow rate reductions of up to 5 percent below the currently specified flow rate. Operation will be allowed at total flow rates slightly lower than (293,540 gpm X (1.0 plus C1)) if rated thermal power (RTP) is reduced by 1.5 percent for each one percent that RCS total flow is less than this rate. This change would provide for needed operational margin and flexibility without the unnecessary penalty of a large power reduction. Date of publication of individual notice in Federal Register: May 25, 1994 (59 FR 27079) Expiration date of individual notice: June 24, 1994 Local Public Document Room location: Cameron Village Regional Library, 1930 Clark Avenue, Raleigh, North Carolina 27605. Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, Docket No. 50-245, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit 1, New London County, Connecticut Date of amendment request: May 27, 1994 Description of amendment request: The amendment would add a new section to Technical Specification Section 6.17 and would require that procedures be in place to provide for monitoring and sampling of emergency service water (ESW) discharge flow during accident conditions when a positive differential pressure cannot be maintained between ESW and low pressure coolant injection (LPCI) in the LPCI heat exchangers. Date of publication of individual notice in Federal Register: June 7, 1994 (59 FR 29448) Expiration date of individual notice: July 7, 1994 Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Notice Of Issuance Of Amendments To Facility Operating LIcenses During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commission has issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined for each of these amendments that the application complies with the standards and requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act), and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission has made appropriate findings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulations in 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the license amendment. Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment to Facility Operating License, Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determination, and Opportunity for A Hearing in connection with these actions was published in the Federal Register as indicated. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendments satisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR 51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impact statement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments. If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the special circumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determination based on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applications for amendment, (2) the amendment, and (3) the Commission's related letter, Safety Evaluation and/or Environmental Assessment as indicated. All of these items are available for public inspection at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555, and at the local public document rooms for the particular facilities involved. Arizona Public Service Company, et al., Docket Nos. STN 50-528, STN 50-529, and STN 50-530, Palo Verde Nuclear Generating Station, Units 1, 2, and 3, Maricopa County, Arizona Date of application for amendments: February 18, 1994, as supplemented by letter dated May 16, 1994 Brief description of amendments: These amendments modify Technical Specification (TS) Figure 3.2-1, ``REACTOR COOLANT COLD LEG vs CORE POWER LEVEL,'' of TS 3/4.2.6, ``REACTOR COOLANT COLD LEG TEMPERATURE,'' for Units 1 and 3 to include the cold leg temperature between 552 F and 562 F at core power levels between 90 percent and 100 percent within the AREA OF ACCEPTABLE OPERATION. Also, the proposed amendments modify TS 3/4.1.1.4, ``MINIMUM TEMPERATURE FOR CRITICALITY,'' and BASES 3/4.1.1.4, ``MINIMUM TEMPERATURE FOR CRITICALITY,'' to allow the minimum temperature for criticality to be established at 545 F, rather than the current value of 552 F, to establish the surveillance temperature at 552 F, rather than the current 557 F, and to clarify the BASES for this TS. Date of issuance: June 7, 1994 Effective date: NPF-41 and NPF-51, prior to startup from the next refueling outage; NPF-74, no later than 45 days from the date of issuance. Amendment Nos.: 77, 63, and 49 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-41, NPF-51, and NPF-74: The amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: March 30, 1994 (59 FR 14886) The additional information contained in the May 16, 1994, letter was clarifying in nature, was within the scope of the initial notice, and did not affect the NRC staff's proposed no significant hazards consideration determination. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 7, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Phoenix Public Library, 12 East McDowell Road, Phoenix, Arizona 85004 Carolina Power & Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-325 and 50-324, Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units 1 and 2, Brunswick County, North Carolina Date of application for amendments: April 14, 1994, as supplemented on May 16, 1994. Brief description of amendments: The amendments change the Technical Specifications (TS) to relocate the Instrument Response Time Tables to the Updated Final Safety Analysis Report in accordance with NRC Generic Letter 93-08. Date of issuance: May 31, 1994 Effective date: May 31, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 171 and 202 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-71 and DPR-62. Amendments revise the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: April 26, 1994 (59 FR 21785) The May 16, 1994, letter provided clarifying information that did not change the initial no significant hazards consideration determination. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 31, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: University of North Carolina at Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington, North Carolina 28403-3297. Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-373 and 50-374, LaSalle County Station, Units 1 and 2, LaSalle County, Illinois Date of application for amendments: August 20, 1993, as supplemented by letters dated December 27, 1993, March 22, 1994, and May 31, 1994. Brief description of amendments: The amendments delete Technical Specification Section 3/4.6.1.5, ``Primary Containment Structural Integrity'' which includes Surveillance Requirements for the Primary Containment Tendons and adds a Technical Specification requirement to establish, implement, and maintain a comprehensive containment tendon program. The containment tendon program is based on Regulatory Guide 1.35, Rev. 3, and is titled ``Inservice Inspection Program for Post Tensioning Tendons.'' The new program will allow the Unit 1 and 2 containments to be tested as twin containments. Date of issuance: June 3, 1994 Effective date: June 3, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 100 and 84 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-11 and NPF-18. The amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: November 10, 1993 (58 FR 59746) The supplemental information submitted December 27, 1993, March 22, 1994, and May 31, 1994, contained clarifying information related to the original request, and did not change the no significant hazards finding. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 3, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Public Library of Illinois Valley Community College, Rural Route No. 1, Oglesby, Illinois 61348. Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-254 and 50-265, Quad Cities Nuclear Power Station, Units 1 and 2, Rock Island County, Illinois Date of application for amendments: December 20, 1993 Brief description of amendments: The amendments increase the minimum critical power ratio (MCPR) from 1.06 to 1.07 for Quad Cities, Units 1 and 2, as a result of the planned implementation of GE 8x8NB-3 fuel for Cycle 14 of each unit. Date of issuance: June 10, 1994 Effective date: June 10, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 146 and 142 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-29 and DPR-30. The amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: February 17, 1994 (59 FR 10003) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 10, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Dixon Public Library, 221 Hennepin Avenue, Dixon, Illinois 61021. Connecticut Yankee Atomic Power Company, Docket No. 50-213, Haddam Neck Plant, Middlesex County, Connecticut Date of application for amendment: February 25, 1994 Brief description of amendment: The amendment adds a new Technical Specification 3/4.7.12, ``Ultimate Heat Sink'' and its associated Bases Section 3/4.7.12. Date of Issuance: May 31, 1994 Effective date: As of the date of issuance to be implemented within 30 days. Amendment No.: 172 Facility Operating License No. DPR-61. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: April 13, 1994 (59 FR 17596) The Commission's related evaluation of this amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 31, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Russell Library, 123 Broad Street, Middletown, Connecticut 06457. Consolidated Edison Company of New York, Docket No. 50-247, Indian Point Nuclear Generating Unit No. 2, Westchester County, New York Date of application for amendment: December 6, 1993 Brief description of amendment: The amendment revises the Technical Specifications (TSs) to provide several temporary one-time changes that are necessary to support the fuel out, chemical decontamination program that is currently scheduled for the upcoming 1995 refueling outage. Specifically, the amendment revises the definition of the cold shutdown condition in TS 1.2.1 by changing the upper limit of T avg for the cold shutdown condition from 200 F to 250 F. The amendment also revises the definition of the hot shutdown condition in TS 1.2.2 by changing the lower limit of T avg for the hot shutdown condition from greater than 200 F to greater than 250 F. Date of issuance: June 9, 1994 Effective date: As of the date of issuance to be implemented within 30 days. Amendment No.: 170 Facility Operating License No. DPR-26: Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: February 16, 1994 (59 FR 7687) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 9, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: White Plains Public Library, 100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York 10610. Duke Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-413 and 50-414, Catawba Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, York County, South Carolina Date of application for amendments: January 27, 1994 Brief description of amendments: The amendments would eliminate the humidity control functions of the containment purge (VP) system humidistats by deleting the surveillance requirement (SR) for periodic verification of automatic isolation of the VP system on a high relative humidity (RH) test signal and heater failure from the existing SR for Catawba Units 1 and 2. Date of issuance: May 25, 1994 Effective date: May 25, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 118 and 112 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-35 and NPF-52: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: March 2, 1994 (59 FR 10005) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 25, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: York County Library, 138 East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730 Duke Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-413 and 50-414, Catawba Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, York County, South Carolina Date of application for amendments: April 29, 1993, as supplemented May 16, 1994 Brief description of amendments: The amendments delete License Condition 2.C.(20) from Facility Operating License NPF-35 for Unit 1, and License Condition 2.C.(11) from Facility Operating License NPF-52 for Unit 2. These conditions address engine teardown and inspection required following the crankshaft failure of an Enterprise emergency diesel generator at the Shoreham Nuclear Plant. Date of issuance: June 2, 1994 Effective date: June 2, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 119/113 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-35 and NPF-52: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: May 26, 1993 (58 FR 30192) The May 16, 1994, letter provided additional information that did not change the scope of the April 29, 1993, application and proposed initial no significant hazards consideration determination. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 2, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: York County Library, 138 East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730 Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina Date of application for amendments: January 13, 1993, as supplemented January 28, February 17, and April 26, 1993. Brief description of amendments: The amendments revise Technical Specification Table 2.2.1, Sections 3/4.1.2.5, 3/4.1.2.6, 3/4.5.1.1, 3/4.5.5, and their associated Bases, and Technical Specification 6.9.1.9, to relocate the values of certain cycle-dependent limits from the Technical Specifications to the Core Operating Limits Report. Date of issuance: May 31, 1994 Effective date: May 31, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 143 and 125 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-9 and NPF-17: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: August 4, 1993 (58 FR 41503) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 31, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Atkins Library, University of North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223. Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-269, 50-270, and 50-287, Oconee Nuclear Station, Units 1, 2, and 3, Oconee County, South Carolina Date of application of amendments: March 23, 1994, as supplemented April 14, May 11, and May 17 (two letters) 1994. Brief description of amendments: The amendments relating to the March 23, 1994, application revise Technical Specification (TS) 6.9.2, ``Core Operating Limits Report,'' (COLR) to include a reference to a Duke Power Company Topical Report describing an analytical method for determining the core operating limits. Specifically, the amendments add: ``(4) DPC-NE-1004A, Nuclear Design Methodology Using CASMO-3/SIMULATE-3P,'' to TS 6.9.2. The May 11, 1994, letter added a statement to TS 6.9.2 that the approved methods used to determine the core operating limits given in TS 6.9.1 are specified in the COLR. The May 11 and 17, 1994, letters provided information regarding Duke Power's transition from the EPRI-NODE-P based methodology to the simulate methodology. Revision 1 to the COLR for Oconee 1 Cycle 16 was submitted by letter dated May 17, 1994. The April 14, 1994, letter revised the TS Table of Contents to delete reference to Table 4.4-1. This table was removed from the TS by an amendment issued on September 16, 1993. Date of Issuance: June 8, 1994 Effective date: June 8, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 206, 206, and 203 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-38, DPR-47, and DPR-55: The amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: April 28, 1994 (59 FR 22007) The April 14, May 11, and May 17 (two letters), 1994, letters provided additional information that did not change the scope of the March 23, 1994, application and the initial proposed no significant hazards consideration determination. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 8, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Oconee County Library, 501 West South Broad Street, Walhalla, South Carolina 29691 Entergy Operations, Inc., Docket No. 50-382, Waterford Steam Electric Station, Unit 3, St. Charles Parish, Louisiana Date of amendment request: December 23, 1993 Brief description of amendment: The amendment revised the Technical Specifications in accordance with Generic Letter 93-05, ``Line Item Technical Specification Improvements To Reduce Surveillance Requirements For Testing During Power Operation'' for radiation monitors, pressurizer heaters, reactor coolant isolation valves, and auxiliary feedwater pumps. Date of issuance: June 6, 1994 Effective date: June 6, 1994 Amendment No.: 96 Facility Operating License No. NPF-38. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: February 16, 1994 (59 FR 7689) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 6, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: University of New Orleans Library, Louisiana Collection, Lakefront, New Orleans, Louisiana 70122. Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket Nos. 50-424 and 50-425, Vogtle Electric Generating Plant, Units 1 and 2, Burke County, Georgia Date of application for amendments: December 30, 1993 Brief description of amendments: The proposed change would allow a one time extension of the allowable outage time for each residual heat removal (RHR) pump from 3 to 7 days to allow modifications to the RHR system while the plant is in Mode 1. Date of issuance: May 31, 1994 Effective date: May 31, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 72 and 51 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-68 and NPF-81: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: March 2, 1994 (59 FR 10007) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 31, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Burke County Library, 412 Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830 Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket Nos. 50-424 and 50-425, Vogtle Electric Generating Plant, Units 1 and 2, Burke County, Georgia Date of application for amendments: November 19, 1993 Brief description of amendments: The amendments modify Technical Specification Table 3.3-2, Engineered Safety Features Actuation System Instrumentation, modifying the Mode for which Item 6.e, ``Trip of All Main Feedwater Pumps, Start Motor-Driven Pumps,'' is required to be operable. Date of issuance: June 1, 1994 Effective date: June 1, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 73 and 52 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-68 and NPF-81: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: December 22, 1993 (58 FR 67847) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June, 1, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Burke County Library, 412 Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830 Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket Nos. 50-424 and 50-425, Vogtle Electric Generating Plant, Units 1 and 2, Burke County, Georgia Date of application for amendments: March 1, 1994 Brief description of amendments: The amendments modify Technical Specification (TS) 3.2.4, ``Quadrant Power Tilt Ratio,'' by adding an exception to the requirements of TS 3.0.4. Date of issuance: June 1, 1994 Effective date: June 1, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 74 and 53 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-68 and NPF-81: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: April 13, 1994 (59 FR 17599) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 1, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Burke County Library, 412 Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830 GPU Nuclear Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-289, Three Mile Island Nuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania Date of application for amendment: February 7, 1994 Brief description of amendment: The amendment revises the plant Technical Specifications (TS) to require the Three Mile Island, Unit 1 (TMI-1) annual radioactive effluent release report for the previous calendar year be submitted by May 1 of each year. The current TS requires the TMI-1 report be submitted within 60 days after January 1 of each year. Changing the TMI-1 due date to May 1 enables the licensee to combine the reports for TMI-1 and TMI-2 into a single report with a common due date. Date of Issuance: June 10, 1994 Effective date: As of its date of issuance to be implemented within 30 days. Amendment No.: 185 Facility Operating License No. DPR-50. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: April 13, 1994 (59 FR 17600) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 10, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Government Publications Section, State Library of Pennsylvania, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box 1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105. Houston Lighting & Power Company, City Public Service Board of San Antonio, Central Power and Light Company, City of Austin, Texas, Docket Nos. 50-498 and 50-499, South Texas Project, Units 1 and 2, Matagorda County, Texas Date of amendment request: May 27, 1993, as supplemented by letter dated April 18, 1994. Brief description of amendments: The amendments upgrade the fuel used in the South Texas Project reactors to Westinghouse VANTAGE 5 Hybrid (V5H) design and implement several analytical and operational upgrades into the South Texas Project Updated Final Safety Analysis Report. The amendments modify related setpoints, limiting conditions for operation, surveillance requirements, design features information, and associated bases in the following specifications: TS Table 2.2-1, ``Reactor Trip System Instrumentation Trip Setpoints,'' TS Figure 3.1-1, ``Required Shutdown Margin for Modes 1 and 2,'' TS Figure 3.1-2, ``Required Shutdown Margin for Mode 5,'' TS Figure 3.1-2a, ``MTC versus Power Level,'' TS 3/4.2.5, ``Power Distribution Limits - DNB Parameter,'' TS Table 3.3-4, ``Engineered Safety Features Actuation System Instrumentation Trip Setpoints,'' TS 3/4.6.1.1, ``Primary Containment - Containment Integrity,'' TS 3/4.6.1.2, ``Containment Systems - Containment Leakage,'' TS 3/4.6.1.3, ``Containment Systems - Containment Air Locks,'' TS 3/4.6.1.5, ``Containment Systems - Air Temperature,'' TS 3/4.7.1.2, ``Plant Systems - Auxiliary Feedwater System,'' TS 5.2.1, ``Containment - Configuration,'' TS 5.3.1, ``Reactor Core - Fuel Assemblies,'' TS 5.6.1, ``Fuel Storage - Criticality,'' and adds TS Figure 5.6-7, ``Minimum IFBA Content for In-Containment Rack Fuel Storage.'' Date of issuance: May 27, 1994 Effective date: May 27, 1994, to be implemented prior to completion of Unit 1 REO5 Amendment Nos.: Unit 1 - Amendment No. 61; Unit 2 - Amendment No. 50 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-76 and NPF-80: The amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: July 7, 1993 (58 FR 36436) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 27, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Wharton County Junior College, J. M. Hodges Learning Center, 911 Boling Highway, Wharton, Texas 77488 Indiana Michigan Power Company, Docket No. 50-316, Donald C. Cook, Nuclear Plant, Unit No. 2, Berrien County, Michigan Date of application for amendment: March 9, 1994, as supplemented April 13, 1994. Brief description of amendment: The amendment revises the Technical Specifications to allow a one-time extension for Type B and C leak rate tests. The Commission had previously granted a one-time schedular exemption from the requirements in 10 CFR Part 50, Appendix J, paragraphs III.D.2.(a) and III.D.3. The exemption extends the maximum allowable time between tests by 150 days. Date of issuance: June 1, 1994 Effective date: June 1, 1994 Amendment No.: 162 Facility Operating License No. DPR-74. Amendment revises the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: April 28, 1994 (59 FR 22009). The April 13, 1994, supplemental letter provided clarifying information that was within the scope of the April 28, 1994, notice. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 1, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Maud Preston Palenske Memorial Library, 500 Market Street, St. Joseph, Michigan 49085. Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-259 and 50-296, Browns Ferry Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 3, Limestone County, Alabama Date of application for amendment: January 14, 1992 (TS 300) Brief description of amendments: The amendments add requirements to the Browns Ferry Units 1 and 3 Technical Specifications to ensure thermal-hydraulic stability, consistent with guidance provided by NRC Bulletin 88-07 ``Power Oscillations in Boiling Water Reactors,'' and Supplement 1 to that Bulletin. Date of issuance: May 31, 1994 Effective date: May 31, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 206 and 179 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-33 and DPR-68: Date of initial notice in Federal Register: April 15, 1992 (57 FR 13138) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 31, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: None Local Public Document Room location: Athens Public Library, South Street, Athens, Alabama 35611 Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, Sequoyah Nuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee Date of application for amendments: February 8, 1994 (TS 93-14) Brief description of amendments: The amendments increase the pressure setpoint for the motor driven auxiliary feedwater pumps switchover from the condensate storage tank to the essential raw cooling water supply. Date of issuance: May 27,1994 Effective date: May 27, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 183 and 175 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-77 and DPR-79: Amendments revise the technical specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: March 16, 1994 (59 FR 12368) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments are contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 27, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: None Local Public Document Room location: Chattanooga-Hamilton County Library, 1101 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402 Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-271, Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Station, Vernon, Vermont Date of application for amendment: July 14, 1993 Brief description of amendment: This amendment revises Sections 3.6 and 4.6 of the Technical Specifications to incorporate reactor coolant system leakage detection requirements to address Generic Letter 88-01 ``NRC Position on Intergranular Stress Corrosion Cracking (IGSCC) in BWR Austenitic Stainless Steel Piping.'' Date of issuance: June 1, 1994 Effective date: June 1, 1994 Amendment No.: 139 Facility Operating License No. DPR-28. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: March 16, 1994 (59 FR 12370) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 1, 1994 No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Brooks Memorial Library, 224 Main Street, Brattleboro, Vermont 05301. Notice Of Issuance Of Amendments To Facility Operating Licenses And Final Determination Of No Significant Hazards Consideration And Opportunity For A Hearing (Exigent Public Announcement Or Emergency Circumstances) During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commission has issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined for each of these amendments that the application for the amendment complies with the standards and requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act), and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission has made appropriate findings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulations in 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the license amendment. Because of exigent or emergency circumstances associated with the date the amendment was needed, there was not time for the Commission to publish, for public comment before issuance, its usual 30-day Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment, Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determination, and Opportunity for a Hearing. For exigent circumstances, the Commission has either issued a Federal Register notice providing opportunity for public comment or has used local media to provide notice to the public in the area surrounding a licensee's facility of the licensee's application and of the Commission's proposed determination of no significant hazards consideration. The Commission has provided a reasonable opportunity for the public to comment, using its best efforts to make available to the public means of communication for the public to respond quickly, and in the case of telephone comments, the comments have been recorded or transcribed as appropriate and the licensee has been informed of the public comments. In circumstances where failure to act in a timely way would have resulted, for example, in derating or shutdown of a nuclear power plant or in prevention of either resumption of operation or of increase in power output up to the plant's licensed power level, the Commission may not have had an opportunity to provide for public comment on its no significant hazards consideration determination. In such case, the license amendment has been issued without opportunity for comment. If there has been some time for public comment but less than 30 days, the Commission may provide an opportunity for public comment. If comments have been requested, it is so stated. In either event, the State has been consulted by telephone whenever possible. Under its regulations, the Commission may issue and make an amendment immediately effective, notwithstanding the pendency before it of a request for a hearing from any person, in advance of the holding and completion of any required hearing, where it has determined that no significant hazards consideration is involved. The Commission has applied the standards of 10 CFR 50.92 and has made a final determination that the amendment involves no significant hazards consideration. The basis for this determination is contained in the documents related to this action. Accordingly, the amendments have been issued and made effective as indicated. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendments satisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR 51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impact statement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments. If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the special circumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determination based on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the application for amendment, (2) the amendment to Facility Operating License, and (3) the Commission's related letter, Safety Evaluation and/or Environmental Assessment, as indicated. All of these items are available for public inspection at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555, and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved. The Commission is also offering an opportunity for a hearing with respect to the issuance of the amendment. By July 22, 1994, the licensee may file a request for a hearing with respect to issuance of the amendment to the subject facility operating license and any person whose interest may be affected by this proceeding and who wishes to participate as a party in the proceeding must file a written request for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene. Requests for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's ``Rules of Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. Interested persons should consult a current copy of 10 CFR 2.714 which is available at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555 and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved. If a request for a hearing or petition for leave to intervene is filed by the above date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, designated by the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition; and the Secretary or the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issue a notice of a hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall set forth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceeding, and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding. The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention should be permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) the nature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to the proceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial, or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of any order which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest. The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subject matter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Any person who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has been admitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave of the Board up to 15 days prior to the first prehearing conference scheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfy the specificity requirements described above. Not later than 15 days prior to the first prehearing conference scheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to the petition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions which are sought to be litigated in the matter. Each contention must consist of a specific statement of the issue of law or fact to be raised or controverted. In addition, the petitioner shall provide a brief explanation of the bases of the contention and a concise statement of the alleged facts or expert opinion which support the contention and on which the petitioner intends to rely in proving the contention at the hearing. The petitioner must also provide references to those specific sources and documents of which the petitioner is aware and on which the petitioner intends to rely to establish those facts or expert opinion. Petitioner must provide sufficient information to show that a genuine dispute exists with the applicant on a material issue of law or fact. Contentions shall be limited to matters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. The contention must be one which, if proven, would entitle the petitioner to relief. A petitioner who fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirements with respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participate as a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subject to any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have the opportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, including the opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. Since the Commission has made a final determination that the amendment involves no significant hazards consideration, if a hearing is requested, it will not stay the effectiveness of the amendment. Any hearing held would take place while the amendment is in effect. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filed with the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Services Branch, or may be delivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555, by the above date. Where petitions are filed during the last 10 days of the notice period, it is requested that the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephone call to Western Union at 1-(800) 248-5100 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700). The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number N1023 and the following message addressed to (Project Director) : petitioner's name and telephone number, date petition was mailed, plant name, and publication date and page number of this Federal Register notice. A copy of the petition should also be sent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions, supplemental petitions and/or requests for a hearing will not be entertained absent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board that the petition and/or request should be granted based upon a balancing of the factors specified in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket No. STN 50-456, Braidwood Station, Unit No. 1, Will County, Illinois Date of application for amendments: April 25, 1994, as supplemented April 28, 1994, April 30, 1994, May 2, 1994, May 4, 1994, and May 6, 1994. Brief description of amendments: The amendment revises Braidwood, Unit 1, technical specifications (TSs) in Appendix A to the operating license by adding additional surveillance and operating requirements to Section 4.4.5.2, ``Steam Generator Tube Sample Selection and Inspection"; Section 4.4.5.4, ``Acceptance Criteria"; Section 4.4.5.5, ``Reports"; and Section 3.4.6.2. This amendment is applicable only for 100 calendar days from the date of issuance, not counting any time when the T hot temperature is below 500 F. These changes revise the existing steam generator tube repair criteria to allow usage of the voltage-based criteria identified by the staff in draft NUREG-1477 as the interim plugging criteria (IPC). Additionally, a footnote is added to TS 3.4.8 to limit the dose equivalent iodine-131 concentration to 0.35 microcuries per gram of coolant for the limited time period cited above. The Unit 1 Bases are revised to be consistent with the changes cited above. Date of issuance: May 7, 1994 Effective date: May 7, 1994 Amendment No.: 50 Facility Operating License No. NPF-72. The amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration: Yes. The NRC published a public notice of the proposed amendment, issued a proposed finding of no significant hazards consideration and requested that any comments on the proposed no significant hazards consideration be provided to the staff by the close of business on May 5, 1994. The notice was published in the Herald News and the Morris Daily Herald on May 3, 1994. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment, finding of emergency circumstances, and final determination of no significant hazards consideration are contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 7, 1994. Attorney for the licensee: Michael I. Miller, Esquire, Sidley and Austin, One First National Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60690 Local Public Document Room location: Wilmington Township Public Library, 201 S. Kankakee Street, Wilmington, Illinois 60481. NRC Project Director: James E. Dyer Florida Power Corporation, et al., Docket No. 50-302, Crystal River Unit No. 3 Nuclear Generating Plant, Citrus County, Florida Date of application for amendment: May 19, 1994 Brief description of amendment: The amendment revises the surveillance requirements in TS 3.3.9.3 and 3.3.10.3, to change the neutron power limits i.e., 10 5 neutron counts per second (cps) and 1E-6 amperes (amps) indications on the source and intermediate range instruments, respectively, for verifying overlap between them. Date of issuance: May 27, 1994 Effective date: May 27, 1994 Amendment No.: 150 Facility Operating License No. DPR-72. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration: No. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment and the final determination of no significant hazards consideration comments are contained in a Safety Evaluation dated May 27, 1994. Attorney for the Licensee: Harold F. Reis, Esquire, Newman and Holtzer, P.C., 1615 L Street, NW., Washington DC 20036 Local Public Document Room location: Coastal Region Library, 8619 W. Crystal Street, Crystal River, Florida 32629 NRC Project Director: Herbert N. Berkow Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-336, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 2, New London County, Connecticut Date of application for amendment: May 27, 1994, as supplemented June 1, 1994. Brief description of amendment: The amendment revises the Technical Specifications (TS) by adding a footnote to Tables 3.3-3, 3.3-4 and 3.3-5 of the Millstone Unit No. 2 TS denoting that the operability of the automatic initiation logic for the auxiliary feedwater system will rely on operator action for the remainder of Cycle 12. Date of issuance: June 7, 1994 Effective date: As of the date of issuance, to be implemented within 30 days. Amendment No.: 176 Facility Operating License No. NPF-49. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration: No. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment, finding of emergency circumstances, and final determination of no significant hazards consideration are contained in a Safety Evaluation dated June 7, 1994. Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Attorney for licensee: Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry & Howard, Counselors at Law, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Dated at Rockville, Maryland, this 15th day of June 1994. For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission Steven A. Varga, Director, Division of Reactor Projects - I/II Office of Nuclear Reactor Regulation [Doc. 94-15025 Filed 6-21-94 8:45 am] BILLING CODE 7590-01F
